Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-913
Budget summary; contents; filing.

The county board shall file with the county clerk the complete budget document, which shall be in the form provided for in sections 23-904 and 23-905. A copy thereof shall also be filed with the Auditor of Public Accounts within thirty days after its adoption. The budget document shall show, in addition to the figures set forth in the general budget summary, the changes made by the county board in the course of its review, revision, and adoption of the budget. It shall also show the tax rate necessary to finance the budget as adopted.

Laws 1937, c. 56, § 7, p. 228;

Laws 1939, c. 24, § 5, p. 130;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 26-2107;

R.S.1943, § 23-913;

Laws 1945, c. 45, § 10, p. 217;

Laws 1993, LB 734, § 31.